sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre audio a video prijímače: Stojanové držiaky pre audio a video prijímače; Náhradné gombíky audio a video prijímačov; Bluetooth adaptéry; Izolátory zemniacej slučky
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Acessórios de áudio > Acessórios de recetor de áudio e vídeo: Suportes de estante de recetor de áudio e vídeo; Botões de substituição para recetor de áudio e vídeo; Adaptadores Bluetooth; Isoladores de ground loop
it: Elettronica > Audio > Accessori audio > Accessori per ricevitori audio e video: Supporti per scaffale per ricevitori audio e video; Manopole di ricambio per ricevitori audio e video; Adattatori Bluetooth; Isolatori per loop di massa
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio pribor > Pribor za audio i video prijemnike: Nosači za audio i video prijemnike; Zamjenski gumbi za zvučne i videoprijemnike; Bluetooth adapteri; Izolatori razlomljene uzemljivačke petlje
es: Electrónica > Audio > Accesorios de audio > Accesorios para receptores de vídeo y audio: Montajes en rack para receptores de audio y vídeo; Perillas de repuesto de receptor de audio y video; Adaptadores Bluetooth; Aisladores de bucle de tierra
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Aksesuarları > Ses ve Video Alıcısı Aksesuarları: Ses ve Video Alıcı Raf Montaj Parçaları; Ses ve Video Alıcısı Yedek Düğmeleri; Bluetooth Adaptörleri; Topraklama Döngüsü İzolatörleri
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvuková zařízení – příslušenství > Příslušenství k audio a video přijímačům: Držáky audio a video receiverů do racku; Náhradní knoflíky pro audio a video přijímače; Bluetooth adaptéry; Izolátory zemní smyčky
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Accesorii audio > Accesorii pentru receptor audio și video: Suporturi pentru montare receptor audio și video; Butoane de înlocuire pentru receptoare audio și video; Adaptoare Bluetooth; Izolatoare pentru bucle de masă
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Acessórios para áudio > Acessórios para receptores de áudio e vídeo: Suportes de rack para receptores de áudio e vídeo; Botões de substituição para receivers de áudio e vídeo; Adaptadores Bluetooth; Isoladores de loop de aterramento
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkiegészítők > Hang- és videovevő-kiegészítők: Hang- és videovevőállvány-rögzítők; Hang- és videórögzítők cseregombjai; Bluetooth-adapterek; Földhurok -eválasztók
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Phụ kiện âm thanh > Phụ kiện đầu thu âm thanh và video: Giá đỡ đầu thu âm thanh và video; Núm xoay thay thế bộ nhận AV; Bộ điều hợp Bluetooth; Bộ cách ly vòng đất
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 부대용품 > 오디오/비디오 수신기 부대용품: 오디오/비디오 수신기 랙 마운트; 오디오 및 비디오 리시버 교체용 노브; 블루투스 어댑터; 그라운드 루프 아이솔레이터
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lyd – tilbehør > Tilbehør til lyd- og videomodtagere: Reolbeslag til lyd- og videomodtagere; Udskiftningsknapper til lyd- og videomodtager; Bluetooth-adaptere; Jordløkke-isolatorer
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiolaitteet > AV-vastaanotintarvikkeet: AV-vastaanotintelinekiinnikkeet; Audio- ja videovastaanottimen vaihtosäädin; Bluetooth-sovittimet; Maaeristäjä
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audioaccessoires > Accessoires voor audio- en videoreceivers: Rekbevestigingen voor audio- en videoreceivers; Audio en video ontvanger vervangingsknoppen; Bluetoothadapters; Ground loop isolators
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频配件 > 音频与视频接收器配件: 音频和视频接收器机架安装座; 音视频接收器替换旋钮; 蓝牙适配器; 接地回路隔离器
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio dodatki > Dodatki za avdio in video sprejemnike: Montažni nosilci za avdio in video sprejemnike; Nadomestni gumbi za AV sprejemnike; Bluetooth adapterji; Izolatorji ozemljitvenih zank
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Αξεσουάρ ήχου > Αξεσουάρ δεκτών ήχου & βίντεο: Βάσεις δεκτών ήχου & βίντεο για ράφια; Ανταλλακτικοί διακόπτες δέκτη ήχου & εικόνας; Προσαρμογείς Bluetooth; Απομονωτές βρόχου γείωσης
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudtillbehör > Tillbehör till ljud- och videomottagare: Rackfästen för audio- och videomottagare; Ersättningsrattar till audio- och videoreceiver; Bluetooth-adaptrar; Jordslutningsisolatorer
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiozubehör > Audio- & Video-Receiver-Zubehör: Rackhalterungen für Audio- und Videoreceiver; Audio- und Videoempfänger-Ersatzknöpfe; Bluetooth-Adapter; Masseschleifen-Isolatoren
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydtilbehør > Tilbehør til lyd- og videomottakere: Stativfester til lyd- og videomottakere; Reserveknotter til lyd- og videomottakere; Bluetooth-adaptere; Jordsløyfeisolatorer
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso priedai > Garso ir vaizdo imtuvų priedai: Garso ir vaizdo imtuvų stovų laikikliai; Garso ir vaizdo imtuvo atsarginės rankenėlės; „Bluetooth“ adapteriai; Nulio kilpos izoliatoriai
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Аксессуары для аудиотехники > Аксессуары для AV-ресиверов: Крепления для монтажа AV-ресивера в стойку; Сменные ручки для аудио- и видеоресиверов; Bluetooth-адаптеры; Изоляторы контура заземления
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオアクセサリー > AVレシーバー関連用品: AVレシーバー ラックマウント; オーディオ・ビデオレシーバー交換用ノブ; Bluetoothアダプター; グランドループアイソレーター
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Akcesoria audio > Akcesoria do odbiorników audio-wideo: Zestawy do montowania akcesoriów do odbiorników audio-wideo; Wymienne gałki odbiornika audio-wideo; Adaptery Bluetooth; Izolatory pętli masy
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > อุปกรณ์ทางเสียง > อุปกรณ์เอวีรีซีฟเวอร์: อุปกรณ์ยึดแร็คเอวีรีซีฟเวอร์; ลูกบิดสำหรับเครื่องรับสัญญาณเสียงและภาพ; อะแดปเตอร์บลูทูธ; ตัวกำจัดสัญญาณรบกวนกราวด์ลูป
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Accessoires audio > Accessoires pour récepteurs audio et vidéo: Supports à caissons pour récepteurs audio et vidéo; Boutons de remplacement pour récepteurs audio-vidéo; Adaptateurs Bluetooth; Isolateurs de boucle de Masse
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音響配件 > 音訊/視訊接收器配件: 音訊/視訊接收器支架底座; 音視頻接收器替換旋鈕; 藍牙傳輸器; 接地迴路隔離器
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиоаксесоари > Аксесоари за аудио- и видеоприемници: Стойки за аудио- и видеоприемници; Резервни копчета за аудио и видео приемник; Bluetooth адаптери; Изолатори за заземителен контур
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Accessories > Audio & Video Receiver Accessories: Audio & Video Receiver Rack Mounts; Audio & Video Receiver Replacement Knobs; Bluetooth Adapters; Ground Loop Isolators